Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.150

Financial literacy and education programs.

The director of financial institutions or the director's designee may establish, administer, and implement financial literacy and education programs, including but not limited to:

(1) Education and outreach programs that assist Washington citizens of all ages in understanding saving, investing, and budgeting, and other skills necessary to obtain individual financial independence, fiscal responsibility, and financial management skills.

(2) Counseling, marketing, and outreach programs regarding residential mortgage transactions, nontraditional or subprime mortgages, predatory lending practices, or other financial products or practices in the marketplace relating to homeownership.

The department may deliver the programs in subsections (1) and (2) of this section using grants, contracts, or interagency agreements with state and local governments and other nongovernmental organizations as necessary. The department may coordinate these programs with ongoing efforts by other public and private sector entities to maximize the programs' effectiveness.

[ 2008 c 3 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 3: See note following RCW 43.320.045.